Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.270

Minors entitled to benefits.

Emergency workers who are minors shall have the same rights as adults for the purpose of receiving benefits under the provisions of this chapter, but this provision shall not prevent the requirements that a guardian be appointed to receive and administer such benefits until the majority of such minor. Work as an emergency worker shall not be deemed as employment or in violation of any of the provisions of chapter 49.12 RCW.

[ 1984 c 38 s 28; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 30; 1953 c 223 s 11.]